Georgia, session 2025_26, HB767.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act providing for the election of the Board of Education of Gwinnett County, approved
April 7, 1972 (Ga. L. 1972, p. 4058), as amended, particularly by an Act approved May 6,
2005 (Ga. L. 2005, p. 3818), is amended by revising Section 2 and adding a new section to
read as follows:
H. B. 767
- 1 -

LC 47 3498
"SECTION 2.
(a) The Gwinnett County Board of Education is authorized to fix the salary and
compensation of the members of the Gwinnett County Board of Education subject to the
following conditions:
(1) Any increase in salary or compensation for members of the Gwinnett County Board
of Education shall not be effective until the first day of January of the year following the
next general election held after the date on which the action to increase the compensation
was taken;
(2) The Gwinnett County Board of Education shall take no action to increase the salary
or compensation of the members of the board until notice of intent to take such action and
the fiscal impact of such action has been published in a newspaper designated as the legal
organ for the county at least once a week for three consecutive weeks immediately
preceding the meeting at which the action is taken; and
(3) Such action shall not be taken during the period of time beginning with the date that
candidates for election as members of the Gwinnett County Board of Education may first
qualify as such candidates and ending with the first day of January following the date of
qualification.
This subsection shall not affect the power of the General Assembly at any time to increase
or decrease any or all of such compensation or to withdraw the authority otherwise granted
under this subsection.
(b)(1) The provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall be suspended in the event:
(A) That the Gwinnett County Board of Education approves a contract termination
payout to the superintendent so as to terminate such contract prior to the contractual end
date of such contract; or
(B) Such contractual payout payments are still being made to one or more former
superintendents.
H. B. 767
- 2 -

LC 47 3498
(2) The suspension provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall remain in force
until such time as either:
(A) The compensation that would have otherwise been paid to the members of the
board pursuant to subsection (a) of this section equals the amount:
(i) Paid to a superintendent to terminate such superintendent's contract prior to the
contractual end date of such contract; or
(ii) Still being paid to any former superintendents as a result of the early termination
of one or more contracts that are being made on the effective date of this subsection;
or
(B) All members of the Gwinnett County Board of Education who were in office when
the board approved a contract termination payout to a superintendent prior to the
contractual end date of such contract have ceased serving on such board.
(3) In the event that the compensation of the board members is suspended by operation
of this subsection, the members of the board of education shall receive the per diem
provided for by O.C.G.A. Code Section 20-2-55.
SECTION 2A.
The Gwinnett County Board of Education and the Gwinnett County Public Schools shall
not infringe upon right of individual board members to communicate with constituents, the
general public, or members of the media; provided, however, that nothing in this section
shall prevent such board from adopting policies to ensure that:
(1) Confidential discussions occurring during an executive session pursuant to Chapter
14 of Title 50 of the O.C.G.A., or
(2) Any information that is deemed confidential, privileged, private, or exempt from
disclosure under federal or state law
is not disclosed or disseminated in an unauthorized manner."
H. B. 767
- 3 -

LC 47 3498
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on the first day of the month following the month in which
it is approved by the Governor or in which it becomes law without such approval.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 767
- 4 -